Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 8 Federal Aid
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-8-1.
State board for vocational education.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education is constituted and designated as the state board for vocational education to cooperate with the federal office of education and veterans administration, or their successors, in the administration of any act of congress relating to vocational education and rehabilitation in agriculture, distributive occupations, household arts, trades, and industries, or to disabled veterans and other persons, and to secure for the state the benefits of that cooperation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-1

.

16-8-2.
Acceptance and administration of the Smith-Hughes Vocational Education Act for vocational education.

The state of Rhode Island having accepted the provisions of an act passed by the senate and house of representatives of the United States in congress assembled, entitled “An act to provide for the promotion of vocational education; to provide for co-operation with the states in the promotion of such education in agriculture and the trades and industries; to provide for co-operation with the states in the preparation of teachers of vocational subjects; and to appropriate money, and regulate its expenditure,” approved February 23, 1917, designates the general treasurer as custodian for vocational education funds as required by that act of congress. The general treasurer shall receive and provide for the proper custody of money paid to the state from the federal treasury under the provisions of the act of congress, and shall disburse the money upon orders drawn by the state controller upon requisitions of the department of elementary and secondary education. The state board for vocational education shall have and shall exercise all the powers necessary to cooperate on behalf of the state with the federal office of education in the administration of the provisions of the act of congress.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1622, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 68, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 193, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-2

.

16-8-3.
Acceptance and administration of the Vocational Education Act of 1946.

The state of Rhode Island accepts the provisions of an act passed by the senate and house of representatives of the United States in congress assembled, entitled “An act to amend the act of June 8, 1936, relating to vocational education, so as to provide for the further development of vocational education in the states and territories” approved August 1, 1946, and designates the general treasurer as custodian for vocational education funds as required by the act of congress. The general treasurer shall receive and provide for the proper custody of money paid to the state from the general treasury under the provisions of the act of congress and shall disburse the money upon orders drawn by the state controller upon requisitions of the state board of vocational education. The state board for vocational education shall have and shall exercise all powers necessary to cooperate, on behalf of the state, with the federal office of education in the administration of the provisions of the act of congress.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 193, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2104, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-3

.

16-8-4 — 16-8-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2959, §§ 1-3; G.L. 1956, §§

16-8-4

— 16-8-6; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 34, effective July 6, 2001.

16-8-7.
School lunch programs — Definitions.

For the purposes of §§

16-8-7

to

16-8-13

:

“School” is construed to mean any educational institution operated on a nonprofit basis, having a graded course of instruction with prescribed standards for the completion of each grade, with compulsory class attendance, and records of class work regularly maintained.

“School board” includes city or town school committees or any person or group responsible for the operation of a private or a parochial school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-7

.

16-8-8.
Acceptance and use of federal school lunch funds.

The department of elementary and secondary education is authorized to accept and direct the disbursement of funds appropriated by any act of congress and apportioned to the state in connection with the establishment and maintenance of school lunch programs. The department of elementary and secondary education shall deposit all funds received from the federal government with the general treasurer, to be placed in a special account, and drawn upon only on receipt of properly authenticated vouchers signed by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-8

.

16-8-9.
Administration of program.

The department of elementary and secondary education may enter into any agreements, with any agency of the federal government, with any school board, or with any other agency or person, prescribe any regulations, employ any personnel, and take any action, that it may deem necessary to provide for the establishment, maintenance, operation, and expansion of any school lunch program, and to direct the disbursement of federal and state funds in accordance with existing provisions of the federal and state laws. The department of elementary and secondary education may give technical advice and assistance to any school board in connection with the establishment and operation of any school lunch program and may assist in training personnel engaged in the operation of these programs. The department of elementary and secondary education may accept any gift for use in connection with any school lunch program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-9

.

16-8-10.
Mandatory school lunch programs.

All public elementary and secondary schools shall be required to make type A lunches available to students attending those schools in accordance with rules and regulations adopted from time to time by the department of elementary and secondary education. To the extent that federal, state, and other funds are available, free and reduced price type A lunches shall be provided to all students from families that meet the current specific criteria established by federal and state regulations. The requirement that type A lunches be provided shall apply to locally managed school lunch programs, and school lunch programs administered directly by the department of elementary and secondary education or by any other public agency whether using school facilities or a commercial catering service. The department of elementary and secondary education is further authorized to expand the school lunch program to the extent that federal, state, and/or local funds are available by the utilization of one or more food preparation centers for delivery to participating schools for the purpose of providing meals to students on a more economical basis than could be provided by a community acting individually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-10

; P.L. 1972, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 45.

16-8-10.1.
Mandatory school breakfast programs.

All public schools shall make a breakfast program available to students attending the school. The breakfast meal shall meet any rules and regulations that are adopted by the commissioner.

The state of Rhode Island shall provide school districts a per breakfast subsidy for each breakfast served to students. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on each district’s proportion of the number of breakfasts served in the prior school year relative to the statewide total in the same year. This subsidy shall augment the nonprofit school food service account and be used for expenses incurred in providing nutritious breakfast meals to students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 23, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 20, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 13; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 7.

16-8-10.2.
Mandatory contract terms.

No school board or school receiving aid under this chapter for school lunch programs shall negotiate, extend, or renew any school lunch service contract unless the contract provides for payments to school-lunch workers and aides for one hundred and eighty (180) days or the length of the contract for the school year, whichever is longer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 159, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 160, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

16-8-11.
Program accounts — Reports — Audits — Inspections.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall prescribe regulations for the keeping of accounts and records and the making of reports by or under the supervision of school boards. These accounts and records shall be available for inspection and audit by authorized agents of the federal government or by the department of elementary and secondary education or its duly authorized agents. The department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct or cause to be conducted any audits, inspections, and administrative reviews of accounts, records, and operations with respect to school lunch programs that may be considered necessary to determine whether its agreements with school boards and regulations pursuant to §§

16-8-7

to

16-8-13

are being complied with, and to ensure that school lunch programs are effectively administered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-11

.

16-8-12.
Studies and appraisals of lunch programs.

The department of elementary and secondary education is authorized, to the extent that funds are available for these purposes, and in cooperation with local school boards and other appropriate organizations, to conduct studies as to methods of improving and expanding school lunch programs and promoting nutritional education in the schools, to conduct appraisals of the nutritive benefits of school lunch programs, and to report its findings from time to time to the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-12

.

16-8-13.
Annual school lunch appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of §§

16-8-7

to

16-8-12

; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1979, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-13

.

16-8-14.
Federal aid funds — Custody — Disbursement.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, any and all money received or that may be received by the state for the use or benefit of the state or any city or town for educational purposes from appropriations made by virtue of or under any act or acts of the congress of the United States shall be received by the general treasurer who shall provide for the proper custody of the money. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the disbursement of the money or any part of it, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2311, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-8-14

.

16-8-15.
Education Jobs Fund.

For FY 2012 only, state general revenue appropriations to all local education agencies — including school districts, charter schools, and state schools — shall be reduced by the amount allocated to each local education agency under the terms of the federal Education Jobs Fund program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 5, § 2.